Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Long Term Care Ombudsman,  for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General  Fund, the following amounts for the
following purposes:
(1) General program and
services provided to
care facility residents ............... $ 7,573,828
(2) Public guardian and
conservator program ................ $ 4,537,166
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$1,209,977 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
and including federal Older Americans Act funds  received from the Department of Human
Services, but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds not described in this section, collected
or received by the Long Term Care Ombudsman.
SECTION 3. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5520 (SB 5520-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 16, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 20, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5520 (SB 5520-A) Page 2